Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.535

International marketing program for agricultural commodities and trade (IMPACT) center created—Primary functions.

There is created an international marketing program for agricultural commodities and trade (IMPACT) center at Washington State University.

In carrying out each of its responsibilities under RCW 28B.30.537, the primary functions of the center shall be: Providing practical solutions to marketing-related problems; and developing and disseminating information which is directly applicable to the marketing of agricultural commodities and goods from this state in foreign countries or to introducing the production of commodities and goods in this state for marketing in foreign countries.

[ 1985 c 39 s 1; 1984 c 57 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 39: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1985." [ 1985 c 39 s 10.]